Connecticut, session 2026, SB00131.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
1 Section 1. (Effective from passage) The Commissioner of Economic and
2 Community Development shall conduct a study relating to the needs of
3 manufacturers in the state. Not later than January 1, 2027, the
4 Department of Economic and Community Development shall submit a
5 report of the results of such study to the joint standing committee of the
6 General Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to commerce,
7 in accordance with the provisions of section 11-4a of the general statutes.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 from passage New section
CE Joint Favorable
SB131 / File No. 215 1

SB131 File No. 215
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
Explanation
The bill has no fiscal impact by requiring the Department of
Economic and Community Development (DECD) to conduct a study
relating to the needs of manufacturers in the state. It is anticipated that
DECD can produce the study within existing resources.
The Out Years
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
SB131 / File No. 215 2

SB131 File No. 215
OLR Bill Analysis
SB 131
AN ACT CONCERNING MANUFACTURING.